Massachusetts, session 194th, S1097.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 120 of chapter 266 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official
Edition, is hereby amended by adding the following 2 paragraphs:-
Whoever, having a good faith reasonable belief that they have a right to access the
premises and receives written notice informing them that they are no longer welcome on the
premises and entering the premises would reasonably result in criminal trespass pursuant to this
section, may file a complaint in the district court seeking to vacate such written notice.
An order to vacate such written notice shall be in the discretion of the court if the court
determines that the person who directly provided said written notice abused their discretion of
control of said premises. The court’s order shall be a complete affirmative defense to any
prosecution against the person receiving such notice under any provision of this section.
of 1